Hawaii statutes.
[§188-58.5] Female ula (spiny lobsters),
Kona crabs, and Samoan crabs; taking or killing prohibited. (a) Unless
otherwise exempted by law, it shall be unlawful for any person to take or kill
any female ula (spiny lobster or Panulirus), Kona crab (Ranina ranina), or
Samoan crab (Scylla serrata).

(b) This section shall not prohibit the taking
or killing of female marine invertebrates identified in subsection (a) if they
are the product of commercial aquaculture and not removed from their natural
environment. [L 2006, c 77, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next